Hawaii statutes.
[§346-365] Program administration. To
the extent that appropriations are made available, the department may contract
with a provider agency to administer homeless facilities or any other program
for the homeless created by this part. The selection of provider agencies to
administer homeless facilities or any other program for the homeless authorized
by this part shall not be subject to chapters 42F, 102, and 103. The selection
of provider agencies shall be subject to qualifying standards and criteria established
by rule.

The provider agency shall be qualified by the department
to operate and manage a homeless facility or any other program for the homeless
authorized by this part pursuant to standards and criteria established by rules
for eligibility. [L 2010, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next